Rhode Island, session 2025, SB583.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-15-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-15 entitled "Actions by
and Against Towns" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-15-5. Presentment to council of claim or demand against town.
(a) Every person who has any money due him or her from any town or city, or any claim
or demand against any town or city, for any matter, cause, or thing whatsoever, shall take the
following method to obtain what is due: The person shall present to the town council of the town,
or to the city council of the city, a particular account of that person’s claim, debt, damages, or
demand, and how incurred or contracted; which being done, in case just and due satisfaction is not
made to him or her by the town or city treasurer of the town or city within forty (40) days after the
presentment of the claim, debt, damages, or demand, the person may commence his or her action
against the treasurer for the recovery of the complaint.
(b) Each fiscal year, every town and city shall be required to disclose on their official
website the following information:
(1) The number of legal actions in which the town or city is a named defendant;
(2) Provide a short summary of the substantive issues of the legal action;
(3) Provide the name of the attorney representing the town or city; and
(4) Disclose all costs and expenses related to the legal action, including, but not limited to:
(i) Court costs;
(ii) Legal fees; and

(iii) Compensatory damages.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000268
========
LC000268 - Page 2 of 3